Hawaii statutes.
§651-9 Writ; how executed. The police
officer to whom the writ is directed and delivered shall execute the writ
without delay as follows:

(1) Real property or any interest therein shall be
attached by recording in the office in which conveyances of the real property
attached is recorded, a copy of the writ of attachment, with the officer's
certificate endorsed or affixed, that by virtue of the original writ of which
such copy is a true copy, the officer has attached the real estate, or all of
the interest of the defendant therein, describing the same with convenient
certainty as the property of the defendant, naming the defendant, in such writ;

(2) Personal property, capable of manual delivery,
shall be attached by taking the same into custody;

(3) A security or any share or any interest evidenced
thereby shall be attached in the same manner as is provided for the levy of an
execution thereon. [L 1905, c 84, §9; RL 1925, §2813; RL 1935, §4198; RL 1945,
§10149; RL 1955, §233-9; am L 1966, c 18, §6 and c 33, §7; HRS §651-9; gen ch
1985]

Revision Note

Pursuant to §23G-15, in:

(1) The
prefatory language, comma deleted after "delivered"; and

(2) Paragraph
(1), "indorsed" changed to "endorsed".

Law Journals and Reviews

Attachment or Levy of a Security Under the Uniform Commercial
Code. 4 HBJ, no. 3, at 16 (1966).

Case Notes

Marshal had no power to enjoin persons not to pay over money
to defendant. 1 H. 44 (1851).

Attachment complete when. 26 H. 342 (1922).

Attachment of motor vehicle registered with the city and
county under the motor vehicle law. 38 H. 298 (1949).

Where levy of attachment not performed by police officer,
attachment not properly levied and should not have been noted on transfer
certificate of title to subject property. 81 H. 270, 916 P.2d 680 (1996).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next